Hawaii statutes.
§576B-308 Duty of attorney general. (a)
If the attorney general determines that the support enforcement agency is
neglecting or refusing to provide services to an individual, the attorney
general may order the agency to perform its duties under this chapter or may
provide those services directly to the individual.

(b) The attorney general may determine that a
foreign country has established a reciprocal arrangement for child support with
this State and take appropriate action for notification of the determination.
[L 1997, c 295, pt of §1; am L 2015, c 77, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next